North Carolina, session 2025, HB1127.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MATERNAL CARE ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.1.(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Culturally respectful congruent. – Sensitive to and respectful of the preferred
cultural values, beliefs, world view, and practices of the patient, and aware
that cultural differences between patients and health care providers or other
service providers must be proactively addressed to ensure that patients receive
equitable, high-quality services that meet their needs.
(2) Department. – The North Carolina Department of Health and Human
Services.
(3) Postpartum. – The one-year period beginning on the last day of a woman's
pregnancy.
SECTION 1.1.(b) Establishment of Grant Program. – The Department shall
establish and administer a Maternal Care Access Grant Program to award competitive grants to
eligible entities to establish or expand programs for the prevention of maternal mortality and
severe maternal morbidity among marginalized and underserved populations. The Department
*H1127-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall establish eligibility requirements for program participation which shall, at a minimum,
require that applicants be organizations led by individuals from communities that have
historically experienced disparities in accessing health and human services.
SECTION 1.1.(c) Outreach and Application Assistance. – Beginning July 1, 2026,
the Department shall (i) conduct outreach to encourage eligible applicants to apply for grants
under this program and (ii) provide application assistance to eligible applicants on best practices
for applying for grants under this program. In conducting the outreach required by this section,
the Department shall give special consideration to eligible applicants that meet the following
criteria:
(1) Are based in, and provide support for, communities with high rates of adverse
maternal health outcomes and significant racial and ethnic disparities in
maternal health outcomes.
(2) Are led by women from marginalized and underserved populations.
(3) Offer programs and resources that are aligned with evidence-based practices
for improving maternal health outcomes for marginalized and underserved
populations.
SECTION 1.1.(d) Grant Awards. – In awarding grants under this section, the
Department shall, to the extent possible, award grants to recipients to reflect different areas of
the State. The Department shall not award a single grant for less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) or more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per grant recipient. In selecting grant
recipients, the Department shall give special consideration to eligible applicants that meet all of
the following criteria:
(1) Meet all of the criteria specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Offer programs and resources designed in consultation with and intended for
marginalized and underserved populations.
(3) Offer programs and resources in the communities in which they are located
that include any of the following activities:
a. Promoting maternal mental health and maternal substance use disorder
treatments that are aligned with evidence-based practices for
improving maternal mental health outcomes for marginalized and
underserved populations.
b. Addressing social determinants of health for women in the prenatal
and postpartum periods, including, but not limited to, any of the
following:
1. Inadequate housing.
2. Transportation barriers.
3. Poor nutrition and a lack of access to healthy foods.
4. Need for lactation support.
5. Need for lead abatement and other efforts to improve air and
water quality.
6. Lack of access to child care.
7. Need for baby supplies such as diapers, formula, clothing, baby
and child equipment, and safe car seat installation.
8. Need for wellness and stress management programs.
9. Education about maternal health and well-being.
10. Need for coordination across safety net and social support
services and programs.
11. Barriers to employment.
Page 2 House Bill 1127-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Promoting evidence-based health literacy and pregnancy, childbirth,
and parenting education for women in the prenatal and postpartum
periods, including group-based programs and peer support groups.
d. Providing individually tailored support from doulas and other perinatal
health workers to women from pregnancy through the postpartum
period.
e. Providing culturally respectful congruent training to perinatal health
workers such as doulas, community health workers, peer supporters,
certified lactation consultants, nutritionists and dietitians, social
workers, home visitors, and navigators.
f. Conducting or supporting research on issues affecting black maternal
health.
g. Developing other programs and resources that address
community-specific needs for women in the prenatal and postpartum
periods and are aligned with evidence-based practices for improving
maternal health outcomes for marginalized and underserved
populations.
SECTION 1.1.(e) Technical Assistance to Grant Recipients. – The Department shall
provide technical assistance to grant recipients regarding all of the following:
(1) Capacity building to establish or expand programs to prevent adverse maternal
health outcomes among marginalized and underserved populations.
(2) Best practices in data collection, measurement, evaluation, and reporting.
(3) Planning centered around sustaining programs implemented with grant funds
to prevent maternal mortality and severe maternal morbidity among
marginalized and underserved populations when the grant funds have been
expended.
SECTION 1.1.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of five million dollars
($5,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used and allocated as follows:
(1) Ninety-three thousand five hundred thirteen dollars ($93,513) in recurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to establish a full-time, permanent Public
Health Program Coordinator IV position within the Department dedicated to
performing the following duties:
a. Providing application assistance to Maternal Care Access Grant
Program applicants.
b. Providing technical assistance to Maternal Care Access Grant Program
recipients.
c. Preparing the reports due under Section 1.1(h) of this Part.
(2) Four million nine hundred six thousand four hundred eighty-seven dollars
($4,906,487) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated
to the Maternal Care Access Grant Program authorized by this Part. The
Department may use up to one percent (1%) of these funds for administrative
purposes related to the grant program. The balance of these funds shall be used
to operate the grant program.
SECTION 1.1.(g) The Department is authorized to hire one full-time, permanent
Public Health Program Coordinator IV position to perform the duties described in subdivision
(f)(1) of this section.
SECTION 1.1.(h) Reports. – The Department shall submit the following reports on
the grant program authorized by this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division:
House Bill 1127-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) A report by October 1, 2027, that includes at least all of the following
components:
a. A detailed report on funds expended for the program for the 2026-2027
fiscal year.
b. An assessment of the effectiveness of outreach efforts by the
Department during the application process in diversifying the pool of
grant recipients.
c. Recommendations for future outreach efforts to diversify the pool of
grant recipients for this program and other related grant programs, as
well as for funding opportunities related to the social determinants of
maternal health.
(2) A report by October 1, 2028, that includes at least all of the following
components:
a. A detailed report on funds expended for the program for the 2027-2028
fiscal year.
b. An assessment of the effectiveness of programs funded by grants
awarded under this section in improving maternal health outcomes for
marginalized and underserved populations.
c. Recommendations for future grant programs to be administered by the
Department and for future funding opportunities for community-based
organizations to improve maternal health outcomes for marginalized
and underserved populations through programs and resources that are
aligned with evidence-based practices for improving maternal health
outcomes for marginalized and underserved populations.

PART II. PROSTATE CANCER CONTROL PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to establish and
administer a statewide Prostate Cancer Control Program that provides free or low-cost prostate
cancer screenings and follow-up to any man residing in North Carolina who meets all of the
following criteria:
(1) Is uninsured or underinsured.
(2) Is not a beneficiary of Medicare Part B or Medicaid.
(3) Is between 50 and 70 years of age and without a family history of prostate
cancer or is between 40 and 70 years of age with a family history of prostate
cancer. For the purpose of this subdivision, a man with a family history of
prostate cancer means any man with at least one first-degree relative who (i)
was diagnosed with prostate cancer, (ii) developed prostate cancer, (iii) died
as a result of prostate cancer, (iv) was diagnosed with a cancer known to be
associated with increased risk of prostate cancer, or (v) has a genetic alteration
known to be associated with increased risk of prostate cancer.
(4) Has a household income below two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the
federal poverty level.

PART III. HEALTH INSURANCE REGULATION CHANGES TO CREATE PARITY
FOR SUPPLEMENTAL AND DIAGNOSTIC BREAST IMAGING
SECTION 3.1.(a) G.S. 58-51-57 is recodified as G.S. 58-3-271.
SECTION 3.1.(b) G.S. 58-65-92 is repealed.
SECTION 3.1.(c) G.S. 58-67-76 is repealed.
Page 4 House Bill 1127-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 58-3-271, as enacted by Section 3.1(a) of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 58-3-271. Coverage for diagnostic, screening, and supplemental examinations for
breast cancer, including mammograms and other imaging, and cervical cancer
screening.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Breast magnetic resonance imaging. – A diagnostic tool that uses a powerful
magnetic field, radio waves, and a computer to produce detailed pictures of
the structures within the breast.
(2) Breast ultrasound. – A noninvasive diagnostic tool that uses high-frequency
sound waves to produce detailed images of the breast.
(3) Cost-sharing. – A deductible, coinsurance, copayment, and any maximum
limitation on the application of a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or
similar out-of-pocket expense.
(4) Diagnostic examination for breast cancer. – An examination for breast cancer
that is determined by the healthcare provider treating the patient to be
medically necessary and appropriate and that may include breast magnetic
resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, and diagnostic low-dose
mammography to evaluate the abnormality in the breast that meets one of the
following criteria:
a. Is seen or suspected from a screening examination for breast cancer.
b. Is detected by another means of examination.
(5) High-deductible health plan. – As defined under the Internal Revenue Code.
(6) Low-dose mammography. – A radiologic procedure for the early detection of
breast cancer using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography,
including a physician's interpretation of the results of the procedure.
(7) Screening examination for breast cancer. – Low-dose mammography, or an
equivalent procedure, that is used to determine if there is abnormality in the
breast.
(8) Screening of early detection of cervical cancer. – Examinations and laboratory
tests used to detect cervical cancer, including conventional PAP smear
screening, liquid-based cytology, and human papilloma virus (HPV) detection
methods for women with equivocal findings on cervical cytologic analysis
that are subject to the approval of and have been approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
(9) Section 223. – Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code or its equivalent.
(10) Supplemental examination for breast cancer. – An examination for breast
cancer that is determined by the healthcare provider treating the patient to be
medically necessary and appropriate and that may include breast magnetic
resonance imaging or breast ultrasound to screen for cancer when there is no
abnormality seen or suspected if the patient meets either of the following
criteria:
a. The patient is at increased risk for breast cancer based on the patient's
personal medical history or family medical history of breast cancer.
b. The patient has a breast cancer risk profile that qualifies the patient
based on current recommendations of the United States Preventive
Services Task Force, also known as USPSTF.
(a)(a1) Every policy or contract of accident or health insurance, and every preferred provider
benefit plan under G.S. 58-50-56, that is issued, renewed, or amended on or after January 1, 1992,
health benefit plan offered by an insurer in this State shall provide coverage for examinations
and laboratory tests for the screening for the early detection of cervical cancer and for low-dose
House Bill 1127-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
screening mammography. The same deductibles, coinsurance, and other limitations as apply to
similar services covered under the policy, contract, or plan shall apply to coverage for
examinations and laboratory tests for the screening for the early detection of cervical cancer and
low-dose screening mammography.
(a1) As used in this section, "examinations and laboratory tests for the screening for the
early detection of cervical cancer" means conventional PAP smear screening, liquid-based
cytology, and human papilloma virus (HPV) detection methods for women with equivocal
findings on cervical cytologic analysis that are subject to the approval of and have been approved
by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(b) As used in this section, "low-dose screening mammography" means a radiologic
procedure for the early detection of breast cancer provided to an asymptomatic woman using
equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, including a physician's interpretation of the
results of the procedure.
(b1) Every health benefit plan offered by an insurer that provides benefits for a diagnostic
or supplemental examination for breast cancer shall ensure that the cost-sharing requirements
applicable to a diagnostic or supplemental examination for breast cancer are no less favorable
than the cost-sharing requirements applicable to low-dose screening mammography for breast
cancer.
(b2) An insurer shall not be required to reimburse a healthcare provider that is not a
contracted provider in the provider network of a health benefit plan offered by the insurer any
reimbursement rate more than the rate paid to a provider that has contracted with the insurer to
participate in the provider network of the health benefit plan for any of the following services:
(1) Diagnostic, screening, or supplemental examination for breast cancer.
(2) Low-dose mammography.
(3) Breast ultrasound.
(4) Breast magnetic resonance imaging.
(c) Coverage for low-dose screening mammography shall be provided as follows:
(1) One or more mammograms a year, as recommended by a physician, for any
woman who is at risk for breast cancer. For purposes of this subdivision, a
woman is at risk for breast cancer if any one or more of the following is true:
a. The woman has a personal history of breast cancer;cancer.
b. The woman has a personal history of biopsy-proven benign breast
disease;disease.
c. The woman's mother, sister, or daughter has or has had breast cancer;
orcancer.
d. The woman has not given birth prior to the age of 30;30.
(2) One baseline mammogram for any woman 35 through 39 years of age,
inclusive;inclusive.
(3) A mammogram every other year for any woman 40 through 49 years of age,
inclusive, or more frequently upon recommendation of a physician;
andphysician.
(4) A mammogram every year for any woman 50 years of age or older.
(d) Reimbursement for a mammogram authorized under this section shall be made only
if the facility in which the mammogram was performed meets mammography accreditation
standards established by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission.
(e) Coverage for the screening for the early detection of cervical cancer shall be in
accordance with the most recently published American Cancer Society American College of
Obstetricians and Gynecologists' guidelines or guidelines adopted by the North Carolina
Advisory Committee on Cancer Coordination and Control. Coverage shall include the
examination, the laboratory fee, and the physician's interpretation of the laboratory results.
Page 6 House Bill 1127-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Reimbursements for laboratory fees shall be made only if the laboratory meets accreditation
standards adopted by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission.
(f) If the application of any provision of this section would render the insured ineligible
for a health savings account under section 223, then that provision shall apply only for
high-deductible health plans with respect to the deductible of that plan after the insured has
satisfied the minimum deductible under section 223, except with respect to items or services that
are preventive care. For items or services that are preventive care under section 223, all
provisions of this section shall apply regardless of whether or not the minimum deductible under
section 223 has been satisfied."
SECTION 3.3.(a) G.S. 135-48.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.51. Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:
…
(9a) G.S. 58-3-271, Coverage for diagnostic, screening, and supplemental
examinations for breast cancer, including mammograms and other imaging,
and cervical cancer screening.
…."
SECTION 3.3.(b) Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of State Treasurer the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to ensure compliance with subsection (a) of this
section by the North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 3.4. Except as otherwise provided, this Part becomes effective October
1, 2026, and applies to insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.

PART IV. HEALTHCARE PROVIDER BILLING REGULATION CHANGES TO
CREATE PARITY FOR SUPPLEMENTAL AND DIAGNOSTIC BREAST CANCER
IMAGING
SECTION 4.1.(a) G.S. 90-701 is recodified as G.S. 90-705.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Article 41 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, as amended by
subsection (a) of this section, reads as rewritten:
"Article 41.
"Pathology Services Billing.Transparency in Healthcare Provider Billing Practices.
"§ 90-702. Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply in this Article:
(1) Breast cancer prevention service. – All services listed under
G.S. 58-3-271(b2).
(2) Cost-sharing. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-271.
(3) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(4) Health benefit plan. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
(5) Health services facility. – A facility that is licensed under (i) Chapter 131E or
Chapter 122C of the General Statutes or (ii) the licensing laws of another state
for the provision of the same services in the ordinary course of business or
practice as would require the facility to be licensed under Chapter 131E or
Chapter 122C of the General Statutes were the facility located in this State.
(6) Healthcare provider. – A health services facility or a person who is licensed,
registered, or certified under Chapter 90 or Chapter 90B of the General
Statutes, or under the laws of another state, to provide healthcare services in
the ordinary care of business or practice, or as a profession, or in an approved
education or training program.
(7) Reserved for future codification purposes.
House Bill 1127-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Insurer. – As defined in G.S. 58-3-167.
"§ 90-704. Billing for certain breast cancer prevention services.
(a) A healthcare provider who has not contracted with an insurer to participate in the
provider network of a health benefit plan shall accept as reimbursement for any breast cancer
prevention service provided to an individual insured under a health benefit plan the amount of
reimbursement provided by that insurer, including any cost-sharing required to be paid by the
patient.
(b) No healthcare provider may bill a patient covered under a health benefit plan or
request additional reimbursement from the insurer for any amount above the amount required to
be accepted under subsection (a) of this section.
…."
SECTION 4.2. This Part is effective October 1, 2026, and applies to services
provided on or after that date.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2026.
Page 8 House Bill 1127-First Edition